csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAIO.yaml
     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawen
     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [adaaweg,adaawek]
     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+0Sg: adaawedaa
     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+0Pl: adaawedaanin
     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweken
     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawekegon
     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+0Sg: adaawesiidaa
     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+0Pl: adaawesiidaanin
     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawekan
     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawekeg
     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawekang
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweyaan
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweyan
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweyaang
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweyang
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweyeg
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawed
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewaad
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: adaawenid
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweng
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiwaan
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiwan
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiwaang
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiwang
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiweg
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesig
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesigwaa
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesinig
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesing
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweyaambaan
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweyamban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweyaangiban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweyangiban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [adaaweyegiban,adaaweyegoban]
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawepan
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewaapan
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: adaawenipan
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+0Sg/0Pl: adaawengiban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiwaambaan
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiwamban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiwaangiban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiwangiban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [adaawesiwegiban,adaawesiwegoban]
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesigoban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesigwaaban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesinigoban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesingiban
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewaanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewaangen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewangen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewegwen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawegwen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewaagwen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: adaawenigwen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewiingen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwaanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwaangen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwangen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwegwen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiigwen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwaagwen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiinigwen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwiingen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewaambaanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewambanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewaangibanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewangibanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [adaawewegibanen,adaawewegobanen]
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawegobanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewaagobanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: adaawenigobanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: adaawewiingibanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwaambaanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwambanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwaangibanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwangibanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [adaawesiiwegibanen,adaawesiiwegobanen]
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiigobanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwaagobanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiinigobanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiiwiingibanen
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Sg: indadaawesiinaadog
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Pl: indadaawesiinaadogenan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Sg: gidadaawesiinaawaadog
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Pl: gidadaawesiinaawaadogenan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Sg: gidadaawesiinaadog
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Pl: gidadaawesiinaadogenan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+0Sg: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg: odadaawesiinaawaadog
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Pl: odadaawesiinaawaadogenan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+0Sg: odadaawesiininaadog
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+0Pl: odadaawesiininaadogenan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg: odadaawesiinaadog
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Pl: odadaawesiinaadogenan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Sg: indadaawesiiminaadog
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Pl: indadaawesiiminaadogenan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Sg: gidadaawesiiminaadog
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Pl: gidadaawesiiminaadogenan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+0Sg: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Sg: indadaawenaadog
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Pl: indadaawenaadogenan	
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Sg: gidadaawenaawaadog
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Pl: gidwadaawenaawaadogenan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Sg: gidadaawenaadog
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Pl: gidadaawenaadogenan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+0Sg: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg: odadaawenaawaadog
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Pl: odadaawenaawaadogenan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+0Sg: odadaaweninaadog
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+0Pl: odadaaweninaadogenan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg: odadaawenaadog
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Pl: odadaawenaadogenan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Sg: indadaaweminaadog
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Pl: indadaaweminaadogenan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Sg: gidadaaweminaadog
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Pl: gidadaaweminaadogenan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+0Sg: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiigwaaban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiinigoban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawesiigoban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawegwaaban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+0Sg/0Pl: adaawenigoban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: adaawegoban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indadaawesiin
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Pl: indadaawesiinan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Sg: gidadaawesiinaawaa
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Pl: gidadaawesiinaawaan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Sg: gidadaawesiin
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Pl: gidadaawesiinan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+0Sg: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg: odadaawesiinaawaa
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Pl: odadaawesiinaawaan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+0Sg: [odadaawesiinini,odadaawesiini]
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+0Pl: [odadaawesiinini,odadaawesiini]
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg: odadaawesiin
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Pl: odadaawesiinan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Sg: indadaawesiimin
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Pl: indadaawesiimin
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Sg: gidadaawesiimin
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Pl: gidadaawesiimin
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+0Sg: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indadaawen
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Pl: indadaawenan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Sg: gidadaawenaawaa
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Pl: gidadaawenaawaan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Sg: gidadaawen
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Pl: gidadaawenan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+0Sg: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg: odadaawenaawaa
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Pl: odadaawenaawaan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+0Sg: [odadaawenini,odadaaweni]
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+0Pl: [odadaawenini,odadaaweni]
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg: odadaawen
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Pl: odadaawenan
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Sg: indadaawemin
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Pl: indadaawemin
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Sg: gidadaawemin
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Pl: gidadaawemin
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+0Sg: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Sg: indadaawesiinaaban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Pl: [indadaawesiinaabaniin,indadaawesiinaabanen]
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Sg: gidadaawesiinaawaaban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Pl: [gidadaawesiinaawaabaniin,gidadaawesiinaawaabanen]
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Sg: gidadaawesiinaaban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Pl: [gidadaawesiinaabaniin,gidadaawesiinaabanen]
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+0Sg: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+0Pl: MISSING
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg: odadaawesiinaawaaban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Pl: [odadaawesiinaawaabaniin,odadaawesiinaawaabanen]
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+0Sg: odadaawesiininaaban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+0Pl: [odadaawesiininaabaniin,odadaawesiininaabanen]
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg: odadaawesiinaaban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Pl: [odadaawesiinaabaniin,odadaawesiinaabanen]
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Sg: indadaawesiiminaaban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Pl: [indadaawesiiminaabaniin,indadaawesiiminaabanien]
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Sg: gidadaawesiiminaaban
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Pl: [gidadaawesiiminaabaniin,gidadaawesiiminaabanen]
